Utah statutes.
17B-1-630.   Increase in appropriations for operating and capital budget funds -- Notice.

The total budget appropriation of any fund described in Section 17B-1-629 may be increased by resolution of the board of trustees at any regular meeting, or special meeting called for that purpose, if written notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting has been mailed or delivered to all members of the board of trustees at least five days prior to the meeting.  The notice may be waived in writing or orally during attendance at the meeting by any member of the board of trustees.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

